Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.200

Privileged communications.

The information and records of a licensed optometrist pertaining to a patient shall be privileged communications, the same as now or hereafter may exist in the relationship of physician and patient and shall not be released or subjected to disclosure without the consent of the patient or as otherwise required by law.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 14.]

NOTES:

Privileged communications—Physician and patient: RCW 5.60.060.